Mississippi, session 2026, HB4016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Supervisors of Wilkinson County, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with construction of or making repairs to a bridge on Pinckneyville Road and making other improvements on Pinckneyville Road as provided in Section 2 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................................. $3,000,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used by the board of supervisors as follows: (a)  Construction of or making repairs to a bridge on Pinckneyville Road................................. $1,000,000.00 (b)  Making improvements on Pinckneyville Road......... .................................................. $2,000,000.00 TOTAL............................................. $3,000,000.00 SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.